Illinois, session 104th, HB2926.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 5Program Act is amended by changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 130/7)7    Sec. 7. Lawful user and lawful products. For the purposes 8of this Act and to clarify the legislative findings on the 9lawful use of cannabis:10        (1) A cardholder under this Act shall not be 11    considered an unlawful user or addicted to narcotics 12    solely as a result of his or her qualifying patient, 13    provisional patient, or designated caregiver status.14        (2) All medical cannabis products purchased by a 15    qualifying patient, provisional patient, or designated 16    caregiver from at a licensed dispensing organization shall 17    be lawful products and a distinction shall be made between 18    medical and non-medical uses of cannabis as a result of 19    the qualifying patient's cardholder status, provisional 20    registration for qualifying patient cardholder status, or 21    participation in the Opioid Alternative Pilot Program 22    under the authorized use granted under State law.23        (3) An individual with a provisional registration for   HB2926- 2 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    qualifying patient cardholder status, a qualifying patient 2    in the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program, or 3    an Opioid Alternative Pilot Program participant under 4    Section 62 shall not be considered an unlawful user or 5    addicted to narcotics solely as a result of his or her 6    application to or participation in the program. 7(Source: P.A. 100-1114, eff. 8-28-18; 101-363, eff. 8-9-19.) 8    Section 10. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 9by changing Sections 1-10, 15-70, 15-75, 15-85, and 15-100 and 10by adding Section 15-88 as follows: 11    (410 ILCS 705/1-10)12    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. In this Act:13    "Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a license 14issued by the Department of Agriculture that permits a person 15to act as a cultivation center under this Act and any 16administrative rule made in furtherance of this Act.17    "Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" means a 18license issued by the Department of Financial and Professional 19Regulation that permits a person to act as a dispensing 20organization under this Act and any administrative rule made 21in furtherance of this Act.22    "Advertise" means to engage in promotional activities 23including, but not limited to: newspaper, radio, Internet and 24electronic media, and television advertising; the distribution   HB2926- 3 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1of fliers and circulars; billboard advertising; and the 2display of window and interior signs. "Advertise" does not 3mean exterior signage displaying only the name of the licensed 4cannabis business establishment. 5    "Application points" means the number of points a 6Dispensary Applicant receives on an application for a 7Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 8    "BLS Region" means a region in Illinois used by the United 9States Bureau of Labor Statistics to gather and categorize 10certain employment and wage data. The 17 such regions in 11Illinois are: Bloomington, Cape Girardeau, Carbondale-Marion, 12Champaign-Urbana, Chicago-Naperville-Elgin, Danville, 13Davenport-Moline-Rock Island, Decatur, Kankakee, Peoria, 14Rockford, St. Louis, Springfield, Northwest Illinois 15nonmetropolitan area, West Central Illinois nonmetropolitan 16area, East Central Illinois nonmetropolitan area, and South 17Illinois nonmetropolitan area. 18    "By lot" means a randomized method of choosing between 2 19or more Eligible Tied Applicants or 2 or more Qualifying 20Applicants.21    "Cannabis" means marijuana, hashish, and other substances 22that are identified as including any parts of the plant 23Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, such 24as indica, of all strains of cannabis, whether growing or not; 25the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the 26plant; and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,   HB2926- 4 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin, 2including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) and all other naturally 3produced cannabinol derivatives, whether produced directly or 4indirectly by extraction; however, "cannabis" does not include 5the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the 6stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other 7compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or 8preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted 9from it), fiber, oil or cake, or the sterilized seed of the 10plant that is incapable of germination. "Cannabis" does not 11include industrial hemp as defined and authorized under the 12Industrial Hemp Act. "Cannabis" also means cannabis flower, 13concentrate, and cannabis-infused products.14    "Cannabis business establishment" means a cultivation 15center, craft grower, processing organization, infuser 16organization, dispensing organization, or transporting 17organization.18    "Cannabis concentrate" means a product derived from 19cannabis that is produced by extracting cannabinoids, 20including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), from the plant through 21the use of propylene glycol, glycerin, butter, olive oil, or 22other typical cooking fats; water, ice, or dry ice; or butane, 23propane, CO2, ethanol, or isopropanol and with the intended 24use of smoking or making a cannabis-infused product. The use 25of any other solvent is expressly prohibited unless and until 26it is approved by the Department of Agriculture.  HB2926- 5 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    "Cannabis container" means a sealed or resealable, 2traceable, container, or package used for the purpose of 3containment of cannabis or cannabis-infused product during 4transportation.5    "Cannabis flower" means marijuana, hashish, and other 6substances that are identified as including any parts of the 7plant Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, 8such as indica, of all strains of cannabis; including raw 9kief, leaves, and buds, but not resin that has been extracted 10from any part of such plant; nor any compound, manufacture, 11salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its 12seeds, or resin.13    "Cannabis-infused product" means a beverage, food, oil, 14ointment, tincture, topical formulation, or another product 15containing cannabis or cannabis concentrate that is not 16intended to be smoked.17    "Cannabis paraphernalia" means equipment, products, or 18materials intended to be used for planting, propagating, 19cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, producing, 20processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, 21repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, ingesting, or 22otherwise introducing cannabis into the human body. 23    "Cannabis plant monitoring system" or "plant monitoring 24system" means a system that includes, but is not limited to, 25testing and data collection established and maintained by the 26cultivation center, craft grower, or infuser processing   HB2926- 6 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1organization and that is available to the Department of 2Revenue, the Department of Agriculture, the Department of 3Financial and Professional Regulation, and the Illinois State 4Police for the purposes of documenting each cannabis plant and 5monitoring plant development throughout the life cycle of a 6cannabis plant cultivated for the intended use by a customer 7from seed planting to final packaging.8    "Cannabis testing facility" means an entity registered by 9the Department of Agriculture to test cannabis for potency and 10contaminants.11    "Clone" means a plant section from a female cannabis plant 12not yet rootbound, growing in a water solution or other 13propagation matrix, that is capable of developing into a new 14plant.15    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 16Program faculty participant" means a person who is 21 years of 17age or older, licensed by the Department of Agriculture, and 18is employed or contracted by an Illinois community college to 19provide student instruction using cannabis plants at an 20Illinois Community College.21    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 22Program faculty participant Agent Identification Card" means a 23document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 24identifies a person as a Community College Cannabis Vocational 25Training Pilot Program faculty participant.26    "Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License"   HB2926- 7 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1means a contingent license awarded to applicants for an Adult 2Use Dispensing Organization License that reserves the right to 3an Adult Use Dispensing Organization License if the applicant 4meets certain conditions described in this Act, but does not 5entitle the recipient to begin purchasing or selling cannabis 6or cannabis-infused products.7    "Conditional Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a 8license awarded to top-scoring applicants for an Adult Use 9Cultivation Center License that reserves the right to an Adult 10Use Cultivation Center License if the applicant meets certain 11conditions as determined by the Department of Agriculture by 12rule, but does not entitle the recipient to begin growing, 13processing, or selling cannabis or cannabis-infused products.14    "Craft grower" means a facility operated by an 15organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 16Agriculture to cultivate, dry, cure, and package cannabis and 17perform other necessary activities to make cannabis available 18for sale at a dispensing organization or use at a processing 19organization. A craft grower may contain up to 5,000 square 20feet of canopy space on its premises for plants in the 21flowering state. The Department of Agriculture may authorize 22an increase or decrease of flowering stage cultivation space 23in increments of 3,000 square feet by rule based on market 24need, craft grower capacity, and the licensee's history of 25compliance or noncompliance, with a maximum space of 14,000 26square feet for cultivating plants in the flowering stage,   HB2926- 8 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1which must be cultivated in all stages of growth in an enclosed 2and secure area. A craft grower may share premises with a 3processing organization or a dispensing organization, or both, 4provided each licensee stores currency and cannabis or 5cannabis-infused products in a separate secured vault to which 6the other licensee does not have access or all licensees 7sharing a vault share more than 50% of the same ownership. 8    "Craft grower agent" means a principal officer, board 9member, employee, or other agent of a craft grower who is 21 10years of age or older.11    "Craft Grower Agent Identification Card" means a document 12issued by the Department of Agriculture that identifies a 13person as a craft grower agent.14    "Cultivation center" means a facility operated by an 15organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 16Agriculture to cultivate, process, transport (unless otherwise 17limited by this Act), and perform other necessary activities 18to provide cannabis and cannabis-infused products to cannabis 19business establishments.20    "Cultivation center agent" means a principal officer, 21board member, employee, or other agent of a cultivation center 22who is 21 years of age or older.23    "Cultivation Center Agent Identification Card" means a 24document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 25identifies a person as a cultivation center agent.26    "Currency" means currency and coin of the United States.  HB2926- 9 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    "Designated caregiver" means a person who is at least 21 2years of age, has agreed to assist with a patient's medical use 3of cannabis, and assists no more than one registered 4qualifying patient with his or her medical use of cannabis. 5    "Dispensary" means a facility operated by a dispensing 6organization at which activities licensed by this Act may 7occur.8    "Dispensary Applicant" means the Proposed Dispensing 9Organization Name as stated on an application for a 10Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 11    "Dispensing organization" or "dispensary" means a facility 12operated by an organization or business that is licensed by 13the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation to 14acquire cannabis from a cultivation center, craft grower, or 15processing organization licensed by the Department of 16Agriculture, or another dispensary licensed by the Department 17of Financial and Professional Regulation for the purpose of 18selling or dispensing cannabis, cannabis-infused products, 19cannabis seeds, paraphernalia, or related supplies under this 20Act to purchasers or to qualified registered medical cannabis 21patients and caregivers. As used in this Act, "dispensing 22organization" includes a registered medical cannabis 23organization as defined in the Compassionate Use of Medical 24Cannabis Program Act or its successor Act or that has obtained 25an Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License or 26Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License at a   HB2926- 10 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1secondary site under this Act.2    "Dispensing organization agent" means a principal officer, 3employee, or agent of a dispensing organization who is 21 4years of age or older.5    "Dispensing organization agent identification card" means 6a document issued by the Department of Financial and 7Professional Regulation that identifies a person as a 8dispensing organization agent.9    "Disproportionately Impacted Area" means a census tract or 10comparable geographic area that satisfies the following 11criteria as determined by the Department of Commerce and 12Economic Opportunity, that: 13        (1) meets at least one of the following criteria: 14            (A) the area has a poverty rate of at least 20% 15        according to the latest federal decennial census; or 16            (B) 75% or more of the children in the area 17        participate in the federal free lunch program 18        according to reported statistics from the State Board 19        of Education; or 20            (C) at least 20% of the households in the area 21        receive assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition 22        Assistance Program; or23            (D) the area has an average unemployment rate, as 24        determined by the Illinois Department of Employment 25        Security, that is more than 120% of the national 26        unemployment average, as determined by the United   HB2926- 11 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1        States Department of Labor, for a period of at least 2 2        consecutive calendar years preceding the date of the 3        application; and 4        (2) has high rates of arrest, conviction, and 5    incarceration related to the sale, possession, use, 6    cultivation, manufacture, or transport of cannabis.7    "Early Approval Adult Use Cultivation Center License" 8means a license that permits a medical cannabis cultivation 9center licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical 10Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to 11begin cultivating, infusing, packaging, transporting (unless 12otherwise provided in this Act), processing, and selling 13cannabis or cannabis-infused product to cannabis business 14establishments for resale to purchasers as permitted by this 15Act as of January 1, 2020.16    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" 17means a license that permits a medical cannabis dispensing 18organization licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical 19Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to 20begin selling cannabis or cannabis-infused product to 21purchasers as permitted by this Act as of January 1, 2020.22    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization at a 23secondary site" means a license that permits a medical 24cannabis dispensing organization licensed under the 25Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act as of the 26effective date of this Act to begin selling cannabis or   HB2926- 12 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1cannabis-infused product to purchasers as permitted by this 2Act on January 1, 2020 at a different dispensary location from 3its existing registered medical dispensary location.4    "Eligible Tied Applicant" means a Tied Applicant that is 5eligible to participate in the process by which a remaining 6available license is distributed by lot pursuant to a Tied 7Applicant Lottery. 8    "Enclosed, locked facility" means a room, greenhouse, 9building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 10security devices that permit access only by cannabis business 11establishment agents working for the licensed cannabis 12business establishment or acting pursuant to this Act to 13cultivate, process, store, or distribute cannabis.14    "Enclosed, locked space" means a closet, room, greenhouse, 15building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 16security devices that permit access only by authorized 17individuals under this Act. "Enclosed, locked space" may 18include:19        (1) a space within a residential building that (i) is 20    the primary residence of the individual cultivating 5 or 21    fewer cannabis plants that are more than 5 inches tall and 22    (ii) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing. The 23    space must only be accessible by a key or code that is 24    different from any key or code that can be used to access 25    the residential building from the exterior; or26        (2) a structure, such as a shed or greenhouse, that   HB2926- 13 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    lies on the same plot of land as a residential building 2    that (i) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing 3    and (ii) is used as a primary residence by the person 4    cultivating 5 or fewer cannabis plants that are more than 5    5 inches tall, such as a shed or greenhouse. The structure 6    must remain locked when it is unoccupied by people. 7    "Financial institution" has the same meaning as "financial 8organization" as defined in Section 1501 of the Illinois 9Income Tax Act, and also includes the holding companies, 10subsidiaries, and affiliates of such financial organizations. 11    "Flowering stage" means the stage of cultivation where and 12when a cannabis plant is cultivated to produce plant material 13for cannabis products. This includes mature plants as follows:14        (1) if greater than 2 stigmas are visible at each 15    internode of the plant; or16        (2) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has been 17    intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 18    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, 19    from the moment the light deprivation began through the 20    remainder of the marijuana plant growth cycle.21    "Individual" means a natural person.22    "Infuser organization" or "infuser" means a facility 23operated by an organization or business that is licensed by 24the Department of Agriculture to directly incorporate cannabis 25or cannabis concentrate into a product formulation to produce 26a cannabis-infused product.   HB2926- 14 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    "Kief" means the resinous crystal-like trichomes that are 2found on cannabis and that are accumulated, resulting in a 3higher concentration of cannabinoids, untreated by heat or 4pressure, or extracted using a solvent. 5    "Labor peace agreement" means an agreement between a 6cannabis business establishment and any labor organization 7recognized under the National Labor Relations Act, referred to 8in this Act as a bona fide labor organization, that prohibits 9labor organizations and members from engaging in picketing, 10work stoppages, boycotts, and any other economic interference 11with the cannabis business establishment. This agreement means 12that the cannabis business establishment has agreed not to 13disrupt efforts by the bona fide labor organization to 14communicate with, and attempt to organize and represent, the 15cannabis business establishment's employees. The agreement 16shall provide a bona fide labor organization access at 17reasonable times to areas in which the cannabis business 18establishment's employees work, for the purpose of meeting 19with employees to discuss their right to representation, 20employment rights under State law, and terms and conditions of 21employment. This type of agreement shall not mandate a 22particular method of election or certification of the bona 23fide labor organization.24    "Limited access area" means a room or other area under the 25control of a cannabis dispensing organization licensed under 26this Act and upon the licensed premises where cannabis sales   HB2926- 15 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1occur with access limited to purchasers, dispensing 2organization owners and other dispensing organization agents, 3or service professionals conducting business with the 4dispensing organization, or, if sales to registered qualifying 5patients, caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid 6Alternative Pilot Program participants licensed pursuant to 7the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act are also 8permitted at the dispensary, registered qualifying patients, 9caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid Alternative Pilot 10Program participants. 11    "Member of an impacted family" means an individual who has 12a parent, legal guardian, child, spouse, or dependent, or was 13a dependent of an individual who, prior to the effective date 14of this Act, was arrested for, convicted of, or adjudicated 15delinquent for any offense that is eligible for expungement 16under this Act.17    "Mother plant" means a cannabis plant that is cultivated 18or maintained for the purpose of generating clones, and that 19will not be used to produce plant material for sale to an 20infuser or dispensing organization.21    "Ordinary public view" means within the sight line with 22normal visual range of a person, unassisted by visual aids, 23from a public street or sidewalk adjacent to real property, or 24from within an adjacent property. 25    "Ownership and control" means ownership of at least 51% of 26the business, including corporate stock if a corporation, and   HB2926- 16 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1control over the management and day-to-day operations of the 2business and an interest in the capital, assets, and profits 3and losses of the business proportionate to percentage of 4ownership.5    "Person" means a natural individual, firm, partnership, 6association, joint stock company, joint venture, public or 7private corporation, limited liability company, or a receiver, 8executor, trustee, guardian, or other representative appointed 9by order of any court.10    "Possession limit" means the amount of cannabis under 11Section 10-10 that may be possessed at any one time by a person 1221 years of age or older or who is a registered qualifying 13medical cannabis patient or caregiver under the Compassionate 14Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act.15    "Principal officer" includes a cannabis business 16establishment applicant or licensed cannabis business 17establishment's board member, owner with more than 1% interest 18of the total cannabis business establishment or more than 5% 19interest of the total cannabis business establishment of a 20publicly traded company, president, vice president, secretary, 21treasurer, partner, officer, member, manager member, or person 22with a profit sharing, financial interest, or revenue sharing 23arrangement. The definition includes a person with authority 24to control the cannabis business establishment, a person who 25assumes responsibility for the debts of the cannabis business 26establishment and who is further defined in this Act.  HB2926- 17 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    "Primary residence" means a dwelling where a person 2usually stays or stays more often than other locations. It may 3be determined by, without limitation, presence, tax filings; 4address on an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 5Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a Disability 6Identification Card; or voter registration. No person may have 7more than one primary residence.8    "Provisional patient" means a qualifying patient who has 9received a provisional registration from the Department of 10Public Health. 11    "Processing organization" or "processor" means a facility 12operated by an organization or business that is licensed by 13the Department of Agriculture to either extract constituent 14chemicals or compounds to produce cannabis concentrate or 15incorporate cannabis or cannabis concentrate into a product 16formulation to produce a cannabis product. 17    "Processing organization agent" means a principal officer, 18board member, employee, or agent of a processing organization.19    "Processing organization agent identification card" means 20a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 21identifies a person as a processing organization agent.22    "Purchaser" means a person 21 years of age or older who 23acquires cannabis for a valuable consideration. "Purchaser" 24does not include a cardholder under the Compassionate Use of 25Medical Cannabis Program Act.26    "Qualifying Applicant" means an applicant that submitted   HB2926- 18 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1an application pursuant to Section 15-30 that received at 2least 85% of 250 application points available under Section 315-30 as the applicant's final score and meets the definition 4of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under this Section.5    "Qualifying patient" or "qualified patient" means a person 6who has been diagnosed by a certifying health care 7professional as having a debilitating medical condition. 8    "Qualifying Social Equity Justice Involved Applicant" 9means an applicant that submitted an application pursuant to 10Section 15-30 that received at least 85% of 250 application 11points available under Section 15-30 as the applicant's final 12score and meets the criteria of either paragraph (1) or (2) of 13the definition of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under 14this Section. 15    "Qualified Social Equity Applicant" means a Social Equity 16Applicant who has been awarded a conditional license under 17this Act to operate a cannabis business establishment.18    "Resided" means an individual's primary residence was 19located within the relevant geographic area as established by 202 of the following:21        (1) a signed lease agreement that includes the 22    applicant's name;23        (2) a property deed that includes the applicant's 24    name;25        (3) school records;26        (4) a voter registration card;  HB2926- 19 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1        (5) an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 2    Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a 3    Disability Identification Card;4        (6) a paycheck stub; 5        (7) a utility bill; 6        (8) tax records; or7        (9) any other proof of residency or other information 8    necessary to establish residence as provided by rule.9    "Smoking" means the inhalation of smoke caused by the 10combustion of cannabis.11    "Social Equity Applicant" means an applicant that is an 12Illinois resident that meets one of the following criteria:13        (1) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 14    control by one or more individuals who have resided for at 15    least 5 of the preceding 10 years in a Disproportionately 16    Impacted Area; 17        (2) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 18    control by one or more individuals who: 19            (i) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 20        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 21        eligible for expungement under this Act; or 22            (ii) is a member of an impacted family;23        (3) for applicants with a minimum of 10 full-time 24    employees, an applicant with at least 51% of current 25    employees who:26            (i) currently reside in a Disproportionately   HB2926- 20 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1        Impacted Area; or2            (ii) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 3        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 4        eligible for expungement under this Act or member of 5        an impacted family.6    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to preempt or limit 7the duties of any employer under the Job Opportunities for 8Qualified Applicants Act. Nothing in this Act shall permit an 9employer to require an employee to disclose sealed or expunged 10offenses, unless otherwise required by law.11    "Tied Applicant" means an application submitted by a 12Dispensary Applicant pursuant to Section 15-30 that received 13the same number of application points under Section 15-30 as 14the Dispensary Applicant's final score as one or more 15top-scoring applications in the same BLS Region and would have 16been awarded a license but for the one or more other 17top-scoring applications that received the same number of 18application points. Each application for which a Dispensary 19Applicant was required to pay a required application fee for 20the application period ending January 2, 2020 shall be 21considered an application of a separate Tied Applicant.22    "Tied Applicant Lottery" means the process established 23under 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1291.50 for awarding Conditional Adult 24Use Dispensing Organization Licenses pursuant to Sections 2515-25 and 15-30 among Eligible Tied Applicants. 26    "Tincture" means a cannabis-infused solution, typically   HB2926- 21 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1comprised of alcohol, glycerin, or vegetable oils, derived 2either directly from the cannabis plant or from a processed 3cannabis extract. A tincture is not an alcoholic liquor as 4defined in the Liquor Control Act of 1934. A tincture shall 5include a calibrated dropper or other similar device capable 6of accurately measuring servings.7    "Transporting organization" or "transporter" means an 8organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 9Agriculture to transport cannabis or cannabis-infused product 10on behalf of a cannabis business establishment or a community 11college licensed under the Community College Cannabis 12Vocational Training Pilot Program. 13    "Transporting organization agent" means a principal 14officer, board member, employee, or agent of a transporting 15organization.16    "Transporting organization agent identification card" 17means a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 18identifies a person as a transporting organization agent.19    "Unit of local government" means any county, city, 20village, or incorporated town.21    "Vegetative stage" means the stage of cultivation in which 22a cannabis plant is propagated to produce additional cannabis 23plants or reach a sufficient size for production. This 24includes seedlings, clones, mothers, and other immature 25cannabis plants as follows: 26        (1) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has not   HB2926- 22 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    been intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 2    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, it 3    has no more than 2 stigmas visible at each internode of the 4    cannabis plant; or 5        (2) any cannabis plant that is cultivated solely for 6    the purpose of propagating clones and is never used to 7    produce cannabis.8(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 9102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 105-13-22.) 11    (410 ILCS 705/15-70)12    Sec. 15-70. Operational requirements; prohibitions. 13    (a) A dispensing organization shall operate in accordance 14with the representations made in its application and license 15materials. It shall be in compliance with this Act and rules.16    (b) A dispensing organization must include the legal name 17of the dispensary on the packaging of any cannabis product it 18sells.19    (c) All cannabis, cannabis-infused products, and cannabis 20seeds must be obtained from an Illinois registered adult use 21cultivation center, craft grower, infuser, or another 22dispensary.23    (d) Dispensing organizations are prohibited from selling 24any product containing alcohol except tinctures, which must be 25limited to containers that are no larger than 100 milliliters.  HB2926- 23 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    (e) A dispensing organization shall inspect and count 2product received from a transporting organization, adult use 3cultivation center, craft grower, infuser organization, or 4other dispensing organization before dispensing it.5    (f) A dispensing organization may only accept cannabis 6deliveries into a restricted access area. Deliveries may not 7be accepted through the public or limited access areas unless 8otherwise approved by the Department.9    (g) A dispensing organization shall maintain compliance 10with State and local building, fire, and zoning requirements 11or regulations.12    (h) A dispensing organization shall submit a list to the 13Department of the names of all service professionals that will 14work at the dispensary. The list shall include a description 15of the type of business or service provided. Changes to the 16service professional list shall be promptly provided. No 17service professional shall work in the dispensary until the 18name is provided to the Department on the service professional 19list.20    (i) A dispensing organization's license allows for a 21dispensary to be operated only at a single location.22    (j) A dispensary may operate between 6 a.m. and 10 p.m. 23local time.24    (k) A dispensing organization must keep all lighting 25outside and inside the dispensary in good working order and 26wattage sufficient for security cameras.  HB2926- 24 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    (l) A dispensing organization must keep all air treatment 2systems that will be installed to reduce odors in good working 3order.4    (m) A dispensing organization must contract with a private 5security contractor that is licensed under Section 10-5 of the 6Private Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, 7Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004 to provide 8on-site security at all hours of the dispensary's operation.9    (n) A dispensing organization shall ensure that any 10building or equipment used by a dispensing organization for 11the storage or sale of cannabis is maintained in a clean and 12sanitary condition.13    (o) The dispensary shall be free from infestation by 14insects, rodents, or pests.15    (p) A dispensing organization shall not:16        (1) Produce or manufacture cannabis;17        (2) Accept a cannabis product from a an adult use 18    cultivation center, craft grower, infuser, dispensing 19    organization, or transporting organization unless it is 20    pre-packaged and labeled in accordance with this Act and 21    any rules that may be adopted pursuant to this Act;22        (3) Obtain cannabis or cannabis-infused products from 23    outside the State of Illinois;24        (4) Sell cannabis or cannabis-infused products to a 25    purchaser unless the purchaser has been verified to be 21 26    years of age or older or the purchaser is verified to be a   HB2926- 25 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    registered qualified patient, provisional patient, or 2    designated caregiver dispensing organization is licensed 3    under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program 4    Act, and the individual is registered under the 5    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program or the 6    purchaser has been verified to be 21 years of age or older;7        (5) Enter into an exclusive agreement with any adult 8    use cultivation center, craft grower, or infuser. 9    Dispensaries shall provide consumers an assortment of 10    products from various cannabis business establishment 11    licensees such that the inventory available for sale at 12    any dispensary from any single cultivation center, craft 13    grower, processor, transporter, or infuser entity shall 14    not be more than 40% of the total inventory available for 15    sale. For the purpose of this subsection, a cultivation 16    center, craft grower, processor, or infuser shall be 17    considered part of the same entity if the licensees share 18    at least one principal officer. The Department may request 19    that a dispensary diversify its products as needed or 20    otherwise discipline a dispensing organization for 21    violating this requirement;22        (6) Refuse to conduct business with an adult use 23    cultivation center, craft grower, transporting 24    organization, or infuser that has the ability to properly 25    deliver the product and is permitted by the Department of 26    Agriculture, on the same terms as other adult use   HB2926- 26 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    cultivation centers, craft growers, infusers, or 2    transporters with whom it is dealing;3        (7) (Blank); Operate drive-through windows;4        (8) Allow for the dispensing of cannabis or 5    cannabis-infused products in vending machines;6        (9) Transport cannabis to residences or other 7    locations where purchasers may be for delivery except as 8    provided in Section 15-88;9        (10) Enter into agreements to allow persons who are 10    not dispensing organization agents to deliver cannabis or 11    to transport cannabis to purchasers;12        (11) Operate a dispensary if its video surveillance 13    equipment is inoperative;14        (12) Operate a dispensary if the point-of-sale 15    equipment is inoperative;16        (13) Operate a dispensary if the State's cannabis 17    electronic verification system is inoperative;18        (14) Have fewer than 2 people working at the 19    dispensary at any time while the dispensary is open;20        (15) Be located within 1,500 feet of the property line 21    of a pre-existing dispensing organization, unless the 22    applicant is a Social Equity Applicant or Social Equity 23    Justice Involved Applicant located or seeking to locate 24    within 1,500 feet of a dispensing organization licensed 25    under Section 15-15 or Section 15-20;26        (16) Sell clones or any other live plant material;  HB2926- 27 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1        (17) Sell cannabis, cannabis concentrate, or 2    cannabis-infused products in combination or bundled with 3    each other or any other items for one price, and each item 4    of cannabis, concentrate, or cannabis-infused product must 5    be separately identified by quantity and price on the 6    receipt;7        (18) Violate any other requirements or prohibitions 8    set by Department rules.9    (q) It is unlawful for any person having a license under 10this Act an Early Approval Adult Use Cannabis Dispensing 11Organization License, a Conditional Adult Use Cannabis 12Dispensing Organization, an Adult Use Dispensing Organization 13License, or a medical cannabis dispensing organization license 14issued under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program 15Act or any officer, associate, member, representative, or 16agent of such licensee to accept, receive, or borrow money or 17anything else of value or accept or receive credit (other than 18merchandising credit in the ordinary course of business for a 19period not to exceed 30 days) directly or indirectly from any 20adult use cultivation center, craft grower, infuser, or 21transporting organization in exchange for preferential 22placement on the dispensing organization's shelves, display 23cases, or website. This includes anything received or borrowed 24or from any stockholders, officers, agents, or persons 25connected with an adult use cultivation center, craft grower, 26infuser, or transporting organization.  HB2926- 28 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    (r) It is unlawful for any person having a license issued 2under this Act an Early Approval Adult Use Cannabis Dispensing 3Organization License, a Conditional Adult Use Cannabis 4Dispensing Organization, an Adult Use Dispensing Organization 5License, or a medical cannabis dispensing organization license 6issued under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program 7to enter into any contract with any person licensed to 8cultivate, process, or transport cannabis whereby such 9dispensing organization agrees not to sell any cannabis 10cultivated, processed, transported, manufactured, or 11distributed by any other cultivator, transporter, or infuser, 12and any provision in any contract violative of this Section 13shall render the whole of such contract void and no action 14shall be brought thereon in any court.15(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 16102-98, eff. 7-15-21; revised 7-23-24.) 17    (410 ILCS 705/15-75)18    Sec. 15-75. Inventory control system. 19    (a) A dispensing organization agent-in-charge shall have 20primary oversight of the dispensing organization's cannabis 21inventory verification system, and its point-of-sale system. 22The inventory point-of-sale system shall be real-time, 23web-based, and accessible by the Department at any time. The 24point-of-sale system shall track, at a minimum the date of 25sale, amount, price, and currency.  HB2926- 29 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    (b) A dispensing organization shall establish an account 2with the State's verification system that documents:3        (1) Each sales transaction at the time of sale and 4    each day's beginning inventory, acquisitions, sales, 5    disposal, and ending inventory.6        (2) Acquisition of cannabis and cannabis-infused 7    products from a licensed adult use cultivation center, 8    craft grower, infuser, or transporter, including:9            (i) A description of the products, including the 10        quantity, strain, variety, and batch number of each 11        product received;12            (ii) The name and registry identification number 13        of the licensed adult use cultivation center, craft 14        grower, or infuser providing the cannabis and 15        cannabis-infused products;16            (iii) The name and registry identification number 17        of the licensed adult use cultivation center, craft 18        grower, infuser, or transporting agent delivering the 19        cannabis;20            (iv) The name and registry identification number 21        of the dispensing organization agent receiving the 22        cannabis; and23            (v) The date of acquisition.24        (3) The disposal of cannabis, including:25            (i) A description of the products, including the 26        quantity, strain, variety, batch number, and reason   HB2926- 30 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1        for the cannabis being disposed;2            (ii) The method of disposal; and3            (iii) The date and time of disposal.4    (c) Upon cannabis delivery, a dispensing organization 5shall confirm the product's name, strain name, weight, and 6identification number on the manifest matches the information 7on the cannabis product label and package. The product name 8listed and the weight listed in the State's verification 9system shall match the product packaging.10    (d) The agent-in-charge shall conduct daily inventory 11reconciliation documenting and balancing cannabis inventory by 12confirming the State's verification system matches the 13dispensing organization's point-of-sale system and the amount 14of physical product at the dispensary.15        (1) A dispensing organization must receive Department 16    approval before completing an inventory adjustment. It 17    shall provide a detailed reason for the adjustment. 18    Inventory adjustment documentation shall be kept at the 19    dispensary for 2 years from the date performed.20        (2) If the dispensing organization identifies an 21    imbalance in the amount of cannabis after the daily 22    inventory reconciliation due to mistake, the dispensing 23    organization shall determine how the imbalance occurred 24    and immediately upon discovery take and document 25    corrective action. If the dispensing organization cannot 26    identify the reason for the mistake within 2 calendar days   HB2926- 31 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    after first discovery, it shall inform the Department 2    immediately in writing of the imbalance and the corrective 3    action taken to date. The dispensing organization shall 4    work diligently to determine the reason for the mistake.5        (3) If the dispensing organization identifies an 6    imbalance in the amount of cannabis after the daily 7    inventory reconciliation or through other means due to 8    theft, criminal activity, or suspected criminal activity, 9    the dispensing organization shall immediately determine 10    how the reduction occurred and take and document 11    corrective action. Within 24 hours after the first 12    discovery of the reduction due to theft, criminal 13    activity, or suspected criminal activity, the dispensing 14    organization shall inform the Department and the Illinois 15    State Police in writing.16        (4) The dispensing organization shall file an annual 17    compilation report with the Department, including a 18    financial statement that shall include, but not be limited 19    to, an income statement, balance sheet, profit and loss 20    statement, statement of cash flow, wholesale cost and 21    sales, and any other documentation requested by the 22    Department in writing. The financial statement shall 23    include any other information the Department deems 24    necessary in order to effectively administer this Act and 25    all rules, orders, and final decisions promulgated under 26    this Act. Statements required by this Section shall be   HB2926- 32 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    filed with the Department within 60 days after the end of 2    the calendar year. The compilation report shall include a 3    letter authored by a licensed certified public accountant 4    that it has been reviewed and is accurate based on the 5    information provided. The dispensing organization, 6    financial statement, and accompanying documents are not 7    required to be audited unless specifically requested by 8    the Department.9    (e) A dispensing organization shall:10        (1) Maintain the documentation required in this 11    Section in a secure locked location at the dispensing 12    organization for 5 years from the date on the document;13        (2) Provide any documentation required to be 14    maintained in this Section to the Department for review 15    upon request; and16        (3) If maintaining a bank account, retain for a period 17    of 5 years a record of each deposit or withdrawal from the 18    account.19    (f) If a dispensing organization chooses to have a return 20policy for cannabis and cannabis products, the dispensing 21organization shall seek prior approval from the Department.22    (g) All dispensing organizations shall maintain internal, 23confidential records of all deliveries to any registered 24qualified patient, provisional patient, or designated 25caregiver. Each entry must include the amount dispensed and 26the date and time the cannabis was delivered. Additional   HB2926- 33 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1recordkeeping requirements may be set by rule. 2(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 3102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 4    (410 ILCS 705/15-85)5    Sec. 15-85. Dispensing cannabis. 6    (a) Before a dispensing organization agent dispenses 7cannabis to a purchaser, the agent shall:8        (1) Verify the age of the purchaser by checking a 9    government-issued identification card by use of an 10    electronic reader or electronic scanning device to scan a 11    purchaser's government-issued identification, if 12    applicable, to determine the purchaser's age and the 13    validity of the identification;14        (1.5) Verify the qualifying patient, provisional 15    patient, or designated caregiver registration card, if 16    applicable; 17        (2) Verify the validity of the government-issued 18    identification card by use of an electronic reader or 19    electronic scanning device to scan a purchaser's 20    government-issued identification, if applicable, to 21    determine the purchaser's age and the validity of the 22    identification;23        (3) Offer any appropriate purchaser education or 24    support materials;25        (4) Enter the following information into the State's   HB2926- 34 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    cannabis electronic verification system:2            (i) The dispensing organization agent's 3        identification number, or if the agent's card 4        application is pending the Department's approval, a 5        temporary and unique identifier until the agent's card 6        application is approved or denied by the Department;7            (ii) The dispensing organization's identification 8        number;9            (iii) The amount, type (including strain, if 10        applicable) of cannabis or cannabis-infused product 11        dispensed;12            (iv) The date and time the cannabis was dispensed.13    (b) A dispensing organization shall refuse to sell 14cannabis or cannabis-infused products to any person unless the 15person produces a valid identification showing that the person 16is 21 years of age or older. A medical cannabis dispensing 17organization may sell cannabis or cannabis-infused products to 18a person who is under 21 years of age if the sale complies with 19the provisions of the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 20Program Act and rules. 21    (c) For the purposes of this Section, valid identification 22must:23        (1) Be valid and unexpired;24        (2) Contain a photograph and the date of birth of the 25    person.26    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a   HB2926- 35 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1dispensing organization may offer pickup or drive-through for 2cannabis or cannabis-infused products to purchasers over 21 3years of age, qualifying patients, provisional patients, and 4designated caregivers in accordance with Section 15-100 of 5this Act.6    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 7dispensing organization may offer delivery for cannabis or 8cannabis-infused products to qualifying patients, provisional 9patients, and designated caregivers, in accordance with 10Sections 15-100 and 15-88 of this Act. 11(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 12102-98, eff. 7-15-21.) 13    (410 ILCS 705/15-88 new)14    Sec. 15-88. Delivery for medical patients and caregivers.15    (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 16dispensing organizations may deliver cannabis and 17cannabis-infused products to the residence of a qualifying 18patient, provisional patient, or designated caregiver in 19accordance with this Section.20    (b) A dispensing organization may deliver cannabis and 21cannabis-infused products to the residence of any qualifying 22patient, provisional patient, or designated caregiver 23provided:24        (1) the order must be placed with the dispensing 25    organization in advance and is not ordered in-person or   HB2926- 36 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    on-site;2        (2) the dispensing organization must comply with 3    Section 15-85 of this Act, as well as confirm the 4    qualifying patient, provisional patient, or designated 5    caregiver is registered under the Compassionate Use of 6    Medical Cannabis Program Act;7        (3) the order must be transported in an enclosed, 8    locked storage compartment that is secured in a locked 9    trunk or affixed to the vehicle making the delivery;10        (4) the order must be delivered to the patient or 11    caregiver's residence by a dispensing organization agent 12    using a vehicle identified in the delivery plan submitted 13    to the Department; and14        (5) at the time of delivery, the dispensing 15    organization agent must verify the person accepting the 16    delivery is the qualifying patient, provisional patient, 17    or caregiver by checking a government-issued 18    identification card.19    (c) The dispensing organization must maintain a manifest 20with details of every delivery, including the amount of 21cannabis or cannabis-infused product delivered to the patient 22or caregiver, the name and address of the patient or 23caregiver, the date and time of the delivery, the name of the 24agent making a delivery, and the vehicle used for the 25delivery. A vehicle designated to deliver cannabis to patients 26and caregivers may make multiple residential stops. The   HB2926- 37 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1Department may require additional information by rule.2    (d) Before providing delivery for qualifying patients, 3provisional patients, or designated caregivers, a dispensing 4organization must submit a delivery plan to the Department. 5The delivery plan shall include: (i) a description of the 6process and controls that will be implemented for accepting 7orders, processing orders, and delivering orders, including 8implementation of recordkeeping of deliveries and protocols 9that will be used to avoid diversion, theft, or loss during 10transportation of orders; and (ii) the make, model, year, and 11license plate of any vehicle that may be used when 12transporting orders. 13    (410 ILCS 705/15-100)14    Sec. 15-100. Security. 15    (a) A dispensing organization shall implement security 16measures to deter and prevent entry into and theft of cannabis 17or currency.18    (b) A dispensing organization shall submit any changes to 19the floor plan or security plan to the Department for 20pre-approval. All cannabis shall be maintained and stored in a 21restricted access area during construction.22    (c) The dispensing organization shall implement security 23measures to protect the premises, purchasers, and dispensing 24organization agents including, but not limited to the 25following:  HB2926- 38 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1        (1) Establish a locked door or barrier between the 2    facility's entrance and the limited access area;3        (2) Prevent individuals from remaining on the premises 4    if they are not engaging in activity permitted by this Act 5    or rules;6        (3) Develop a policy that addresses the maximum 7    capacity and purchaser flow in the waiting rooms and 8    limited access areas;9        (4) Dispose of cannabis in accordance with this Act 10    and rules;11        (5) During hours of operation, store and dispense all 12    cannabis from the restricted access area. During 13    operational hours, cannabis shall be stored in an enclosed 14    locked room or cabinet and accessible only to specifically 15    authorized dispensing organization agents;16        (5.5) During hours of operation, dispense all cannabis 17    or cannabis-infused products: (i) in the restricted access 18    area; (ii) from a drive-through window in accordance with 19    this Act; (iii) from a pickup area contiguous to the real 20    property of the dispensary in accordance with this Act; or 21    (iv) via delivery to a registered qualified patient, 22    provisional patient, or caregiver in accordance with this 23    Act; 24        (6) When the dispensary is closed, store all cannabis 25    and currency in a reinforced vault room in the restricted 26    access area and in a manner as to prevent diversion,   HB2926- 39 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    theft, or loss;2        (7) Keep the reinforced vault room and any other 3    equipment or cannabis storage areas securely locked and 4    protected from unauthorized entry;5        (8) Keep an electronic daily log of dispensing 6    organization agents with access to the reinforced vault 7    room and knowledge of the access code or combination;8        (9) Keep all locks and security equipment in good 9    working order;10        (10) Maintain an operational security and alarm system 11    at all times;12        (11) Prohibit keys, if applicable, from being left in 13    the locks, or stored or placed in a location accessible to 14    persons other than specifically authorized personnel;15        (12) Prohibit accessibility of security measures, 16    including combination numbers, passwords, or electronic or 17    biometric security systems to persons other than 18    specifically authorized dispensing organization agents;19        (13) Ensure that the dispensary interior and exterior 20    premises are sufficiently lit to facilitate surveillance;21        (14) Ensure that trees, bushes, and other foliage 22    outside of the dispensary premises do not allow for a 23    person or persons to conceal themselves from sight;24        (15) Develop emergency policies and procedures for 25    securing all product and currency following any instance 26    of diversion, theft, or loss of cannabis, and conduct an   HB2926- 40 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    assessment to determine whether additional safeguards are 2    necessary; and3        (16) Develop sufficient additional safeguards in 4    response to any special security concerns, or as required 5    by the Department; and .6        (17) Maintain a security and safe storage plan for 7    qualifying patient information. 8    (d) The Department may request or approve alternative 9security provisions that it determines are an adequate 10substitute for a security requirement specified in this 11Article. Any additional protections may be considered by the 12Department in evaluating overall security measures.13    (e) A dispensing organization may share premises with a 14craft grower or an infuser organization, or both, provided 15each licensee stores currency and cannabis or cannabis-infused 16products in a separate secured vault to which the other 17licensee does not have access or all licensees sharing a vault 18share more than 50% of the same ownership.19    (f) A dispensing organization shall provide additional 20security as needed and in a manner appropriate for the 21community where it operates.22    (g) Restricted access areas.23        (1) All restricted access areas must be identified by 24    the posting of a sign that is a minimum of 12 inches by 12 25    inches and that states "Do Not Enter - Restricted Access 26    Area - Authorized Personnel Only" in lettering no smaller   HB2926- 41 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    than one inch in height.2        (2) All restricted access areas shall be clearly 3    described in the floor plan of the premises, in the form 4    and manner determined by the Department, reflecting walls, 5    partitions, counters, and all areas of entry and exit. The 6    floor plan shall show all storage, disposal, and retail 7    sales areas.8        (3) All restricted access areas must be secure, with 9    locking devices that prevent access from the limited 10    access areas.11    (h) Security and alarm.12        (1) A dispensing organization shall have an adequate 13    security plan and security system to prevent and detect 14    diversion, theft, or loss of cannabis, currency, or 15    unauthorized intrusion using commercial grade equipment 16    installed by an Illinois licensed private alarm contractor 17    or private alarm contractor agency that shall, at a 18    minimum, include:19            (i) A perimeter alarm on all entry points and 20        glass break protection on perimeter windows;21            (ii) Security shatterproof tinted film on exterior 22        windows;23            (iii) A failure notification system that provides 24        an audible, text, or visual notification of any 25        failure in the surveillance system, including, but not 26        limited to, panic buttons, alarms, and video   HB2926- 42 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1        monitoring system. The failure notification system 2        shall provide an alert to designated dispensing 3        organization agents within 5 minutes after the 4        failure, either by telephone or text message;5            (iv) A duress alarm, panic button, and alarm, or 6        holdup alarm and after-hours intrusion detection alarm 7        that by design and purpose will directly or indirectly 8        notify, by the most efficient means, the Public Safety 9        Answering Point for the law enforcement agency having 10        primary jurisdiction;11            (v) Security equipment to deter and prevent 12        unauthorized entrance into the dispensary, including 13        electronic door locks on the limited and restricted 14        access areas that include devices or a series of 15        devices to detect unauthorized intrusion that may 16        include a signal system interconnected with a radio 17        frequency method, cellular, private radio signals or 18        other mechanical or electronic device.19        (2) All security system equipment and recordings shall 20    be maintained in good working order, in a secure location 21    so as to prevent theft, loss, destruction, or alterations.22        (3) Access to surveillance monitoring recording 23    equipment shall be limited to persons who are essential to 24    surveillance operations, law enforcement authorities 25    acting within their jurisdiction, security system service 26    personnel, and the Department. A current list of   HB2926- 43 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    authorized dispensing organization agents and service 2    personnel that have access to the surveillance equipment 3    must be available to the Department upon request.4        (4) All security equipment shall be inspected and 5    tested at regular intervals, not to exceed one month from 6    the previous inspection, and tested to ensure the systems 7    remain functional.8        (5) The security system shall provide protection 9    against theft and diversion that is facilitated or hidden 10    by tampering with computers or electronic records.11        (6) The dispensary shall ensure all access doors are 12    not solely controlled by an electronic access panel to 13    ensure that locks are not released during a power outage.14    (i) To monitor the dispensary, the dispensing organization 15shall incorporate continuous electronic video monitoring 16including the following:17        (1) All monitors must be 19 inches or greater;18        (2) Unobstructed video surveillance of all enclosed 19    dispensary areas, unless prohibited by law, including all 20    points of entry and exit that shall be appropriate for the 21    normal lighting conditions of the area under surveillance. 22    The cameras shall be directed so all areas are captured, 23    including, but not limited to, safes, vaults, sales areas, 24    and areas where cannabis is stored, handled, dispensed, or 25    destroyed. Cameras shall be angled to allow for facial 26    recognition, the capture of clear and certain   HB2926- 44 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    identification of any person entering or exiting the 2    dispensary area and in lighting sufficient during all 3    times of night or day;4        (3) Unobstructed video surveillance of outside areas, 5    the storefront, and the parking lot, that shall be 6    appropriate for the normal lighting conditions of the area 7    under surveillance. Cameras shall be angled so as to allow 8    for the capture of facial recognition, clear and certain 9    identification of any person entering or exiting the 10    dispensary and the immediate surrounding area, and license 11    plates of vehicles in the parking lot;12        (4) 24-hour recordings from all video cameras 13    available for immediate viewing by the Department upon 14    request. Recordings shall not be destroyed or altered and 15    shall be retained for at least 90 days. Recordings shall 16    be retained as long as necessary if the dispensing 17    organization is aware of the loss or theft of cannabis or a 18    pending criminal, civil, or administrative investigation 19    or legal proceeding for which the recording may contain 20    relevant information;21        (5) The ability to immediately produce a clear, color 22    still photo from the surveillance video, either live or 23    recorded;24        (6) A date and time stamp embedded on all video 25    surveillance recordings. The date and time shall be 26    synchronized and set correctly and shall not significantly   HB2926- 45 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    obscure the picture;2        (7) The ability to remain operational during a power 3    outage and ensure all access doors are not solely 4    controlled by an electronic access panel to ensure that 5    locks are not released during a power outage;6        (8) All video surveillance equipment shall allow for 7    the exporting of still images in an industry standard 8    image format, including .jpg, .bmp, and .gif. Exported 9    video shall have the ability to be archived in a 10    proprietary format that ensures authentication of the 11    video and guarantees that no alteration of the recorded 12    image has taken place. Exported video shall also have the 13    ability to be saved in an industry standard file format 14    that can be played on a standard computer operating 15    system. All recordings shall be erased or destroyed before 16    disposal;17        (9) The video surveillance system shall be operational 18    during a power outage with a 4-hour minimum battery 19    backup;20        (10) A video camera or cameras recording at each 21    point-of-sale location allowing for the identification of 22    the dispensing organization agent distributing the 23    cannabis and any purchaser. The camera or cameras shall 24    capture the sale, the individuals and the computer 25    monitors used for the sale;26        (11) A failure notification system that provides an   HB2926- 46 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1    audible and visual notification of any failure in the 2    electronic video monitoring system; and3        (12) All electronic video surveillance monitoring must 4    record at least the equivalent of 8 frames per second and 5    be available as recordings to the Department and the 6    Illinois State Police 24 hours a day via a secure 7    web-based portal with reverse functionality.8    (j) The requirements contained in this Act are minimum 9requirements for operating a dispensing organization. The 10Department may establish additional requirements by rule.11(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 12102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)  HB2926- 47 -LRB104 07797 BDA 17843 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    410 ILCS 130/74    410 ILCS 705/1-105    410 ILCS 705/15-706    410 ILCS 705/15-757    410 ILCS 705/15-858    410 ILCS 705/15-88 new9    410 ILCS 705/15-100